Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-914.01
Tribal court, defined.

Tribal court means a court or tribunal authorized by a tribe to adjudicate legal disputes and carry out the administration of justice in accordance with tribal law.

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 13.